District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.64

Employment contracts with subordinate agency heads.

(a)

The Mayor shall not enter into an employment contract with a subordinate agency head that contains terms and conditions of employment that are inconsistent with existing law.

(b)

If the Mayor executes an employment contract with a subordinate agency head in the Executive Service, the contract shall be posted to the website of the District of Columbia Department of Human Resources within 30 days of signing. The requirement to post the contract shall be subject to relevant exemptions pursuant to § 2-534 and required disclosures pursuant to § 2-536.

(c)

An employment contract, if any, with a subordinate agency head shall be transmitted to the Council simultaneously with the transmittal of the nomination of the subordinate agency head.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1064
as added Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-83, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11024